Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB753.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-MPUT DOWN ROOTS PA PILOT PROGRAMSection 101-M. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Manufactured home." Any of the following:(1) A manufactured home as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 5402(6) (relating to definitions).(2) A mobile home as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Program." The Put Down Roots PA Pilot Program established under section 102-M(a).Section 102-M. Establishment of program.(a) Establishment.--The Put Down Roots PA Pilot Program is established within the agency.(b) Purpose.--The program shall provide student loan relief for an individual who purchases a home in this Commonwealth for the first time.Section 103-M. Duties of agency.The agency shall have the following duties:(1) Administer the program and, in the agency's sole 20250SB0753PN0789 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 discretion, award a grant under the program to an individual who submits a completed application to the agency and meets the eligibility criteria under section 104-M.(2) Develop an application form that an individual may use to apply for a grant award under the program.(3) Award grants under the program in a geographically diverse manner throughout this Commonwealth.Section 104-M. Program eligibility.An individual who meets all of the following criteria shall be eligible to submit an application to the agency for a grant award under the program:(1) Has purchased a home within this Commonwealth.(2) Lives in or intends to live in the home as the individual's primary residence.(3) Has never purchased or owned a home in this Commonwealth prior to the purchase of the home under paragraph (1).(4) Agrees to reside in the home for a minimum of three years.(5) Has an annual household income that does not exceed $200,000.Section 105-M. Limitations on grants.(a) Amount.--The agency may award a grant under the program to an individual who submits a completed application to the agency and meets the eligibility requirements under section 104-M in an amount not to exceed $40,000.(b) Prohibition.--The agency may not award any of the following:(1) A grant under the program to an individual that exceeds the individual's student loan debt.20250SB0753PN0789 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A grant under the program that exceeds 15% of the purchase price of an individual's home.(3) More than one grant under the program to a single individual under this article.(4) More than one grant under the program to a single home address.Section 106-M. Joint applicants.If there is more than one individual on a deed or title of a manufactured home, each individual who meets the eligibility criteria under section 104-M may submit an application to the agency for a grant award under the program. The individuals who are on the deed or title of the manufactured home shall determine which individual may receive a grant award under the program, subject to the limitations under section 105-M.Section 107-M. Taxation.A grant award provided under the program shall not be included in classes of income under section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 108-M. Administrative fees. The agency may impose a reasonable administrative fee for the direct costs associated for the implementation of the program.Section 109-M. Annual report.No later than one year after the opening of applications for grant awards under the program and each year thereafter, the agency shall post on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website and report to the Governor and the General Assembly, at a minimum, the following:(1) The number of applications received in the previous year.20250SB0753PN0789 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The total number of applications received since the inception of the program.(3) The number of grants awarded in the previous year.(4) The total number of grants awarded since the inception of the program.(5) The minimum, maximum and average grant amount awarded in the previous year.(6) The minimum, maximum and average grant amount awarded since the inception of the program.(7) The household income of each individual who received a grant award in the previous year.(8) The household income of each individual who received a grant award since the inception of the program.(9) The number of years of home ownership for each individual since receiving a grant award.(10) Any other relevant information as the agency may determine.Section 110-M. Notice of application period.(a) Acceptance of applications.--Upon receipt of money appropriated by the General Assembly for the program, the agency shall transmit a notice of the appropriation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. Upon the date of publication of the notice under this subsection, the agency may begin accepting applications for grant awards under the program.(b) Cessation of applications.--Upon the expenditure of all money appropriated by the General Assembly, the agency shall transmit a notice of the expenditure to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. Upon the date of publication of the 20250SB0753PN0789 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice under this subsection, the agency shall cease accepting applications for grant awards under the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0753PN0789 - 6 - 123